Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.100

Service on foreign corporation.

Service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon the foreign corporation may be made in accordance with RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2139; 1989 c 165 s 178.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.